District of Columbia statutes.
4-217.09

Condition of eligibility — Exception to cooperation.

(a)

An applicant for or recipient of aid shall be required to comply with the requirements of § 4-217.08, unless such applicant or recipient is found to have good cause for refusing to so cooperate as determined by the Mayor, in accordance with standards prescribed by the Mayor, and which standards shall take into consideration the best interests of the child on whose behalf aid is claimed.

(b)

The Mayor shall make a timely determination of whether good cause exists.

(c)

The agency administering assistance shall promptly report any information to the IV-D agency that is provided by the applicant or recipient that relates to a good cause determination.

(d)

Assistance shall not be denied, delayed, reduced, or discontinued pending a determination of good cause for refusal to cooperate if the applicant or recipient has made a good faith effort to substantiate the claim.

(e)

An applicant or recipient may claim good cause for noncooperation at any time. An applicant’s or recipient’s decision not to claim good cause shall not preclude the applicant or recipient from claiming good cause at a later date.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1709, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(zzz), 46 DCR 905
This section is referenced in § 4-217.08, § 4-217.10, § 4-217.11, and § 16-2343.
1981 Ed., § 3-217.9.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(v) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(v) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(zzz) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(v) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(v) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(v) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(zzz) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(zzz) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(zzz) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(zzz) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).